Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1904
Surveyor's certificate; use as evidence; effect.

The certificate of the county surveyor of any survey made by him of any lands in the county shall be presumptive evidence of the facts stated therein, unless such surveyor shall be interested in the same.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 2, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 5688;

C.S.1922, § 5018;

C.S.1929, § 26-1604;

R.S.1943, § 23-1904.